Utah, session 2026, HB275.
Section 1. Section 41-6a-312 is enacted to read:41-6a-312. Red light camera pilot program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Applicable law enforcement agency" means the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over a high-risk intersection.(b)"Department of Transportation" means the Department of Transportation created in Section 72-1-201.(c)"High-risk intersection" means an intersection designated as a high-risk intersection by the Department of Transportation, in consultation with the applicable law enforcement agency, based on:(i)crash data;(ii)traffic data; and(iii)injury and fatality data.(d)"Red light camera" means a camera that is programmed to detect and photograph a vehicle that crosses an intersection when prohibited by a steady circular red light or a red arrow light on a traffic-control signal.(e)"Red light camera pilot program" means the pilot program established in Subsection (2)(a).(2)(a)The Department of Transportation shall establish a red light camera pilot program to begin no later than January 1, 2027, and end no later than April 30, 2028.(b)The pilot program shall include up to 10 high-risk intersections selected under Subsection (3).(c)For each high-risk intersection the program shall include:(i)an initial data collection phase of at least 60 days at each high-risk intersection to establish a baseline of data; and(ii)a public education phase of at least 120 days including:(A)notifying the public of the installation of a red light camera; and(B)issuing a warning to the registered owner of a vehicle identified by a red light camera as violating Subsection 41-6a-305(4).(3)The Department of Transportation shall:(a)identify up to 10 high-risk intersections for inclusion in the pilot program;(b)post a sign described in Subsection (7);(c)in accordance with Subsection (4), contract with a vendor to obtain red light cameras sufficient to implement the red light pilot program;(d)manage the use and maintenance of a red light camera and red light camera notice sign;(e)collect and send, or ensure the red light camera vendor collects and sends, necessary data captured by a red light camera to the applicable law enforcement agency for the applicable law enforcement agency to send the warning described in Subsection (8); and(f)coordinate with an applicable law enforcement agency for implementation of the pilot program, including the placement location of a red light camera.(4)(a)The Department of Transportation shall contract to purchase or lease a red light camera for use by the department or a local highway authority.(b)The Department of Transportation shall use existing Department of Transportation funds to purchase, lease, or rent a red light camera for the pilot program.(c)The Department of Transportation may not enter into a contract with a vendor if the contract requires issuance of a citation by an applicable law enforcement agency for an alleged violation.(5)(a)The Department of Transportation may not collect evidence of, or issue a warning for, an alleged red light camera violation.(b)Only an applicable law enforcement agency may collect evidence of, or issue a warning for, an alleged red light camera violation.(6)An applicable law enforcement agency shall:(a)consult with the Department of Transportation for the Department of Transportation to contract to purchase or lease a red light camera from a vendor;(b)enter into an interlocal agreement with the Department of Transportation or vendor to receive the captured data described in Subsection (8)(a);(c)identify the owner of a vehicle based on the photograph of the vehicle's license plate; and(d)send the owner of the vehicle described in Subsection (8)(a) the warning described in Subsection (8).(7)An applicable law enforcement agency may not use a red light camera in a high-risk intersection unless:(a)a prominent sign is posted on the highway providing notice to a motorist, as the motorist approaches the high-risk intersection, that a red light camera is in use at the intersection; and(b)a warning issued under Subsection (8)(b) is accompanied by the photograph produced by the red light camera.(8)(a)When an applicable law enforcement agency is notified that a red light camera has captured evidence of an individual violating Subsection 41-6a-305(4) during the public education phase described in Subsection (2)(c), the applicable law enforcement agency shall:(i)for a vehicle registered in this state, issue notice to the registered owner by mail or by personal service within 30 days after the day of the alleged violation; or(ii)for a vehicle registered in another state, issue notice to the registered owner by mail or personal service within 60 days after the date of the alleged violation.(b)A notice issued by an applicable law enforcement agency as described in Subsection (8)(a) shall:(i)provide information and evidence of the alleged violation, including the photograph of the vehicle's license plate; and(ii)provide a warning to the owner of the vehicle involved in the alleged violation.(c)A warning issued under Subsection (8)(b) may not impose a civil or criminal penalty.(9)(a)An applicable law enforcement agency may not purchase, lease, install, or maintain a red light camera.(b)Only the Department of Transportation may:(i)purchase, lease, install, or maintain a red light camera; or(ii)contract with a vendor to install or maintain a red light camera.(10)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (7)(b), data or evidence captured by a red light camera may not be used as evidence in a criminal or civil proceeding or investigation.(b)A law enforcement agency may access and use data or evidence captured by a red light camera used as part of the red light camera pilot program pursuant to a warrant issued under the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure or an equivalent federal warrant for a purpose other than warning a vehicle owner of a violation of Subsection 41-6a-305(4).(c)A law enforcement agency may only use a red light camera:(i)in accordance with an interlocal agreement with the Department of Transportation as described in this section; and(ii)for a purpose described in this section.(11)A moving traffic violation warning described in Subsection (8)(b) issued using information gathered by a red light camera is not a reportable violation as defined under Section 53-3-102, and the Driver License Division may not assess points under Section 53-3-221 against the driving record of an individual for the violation.(12)The Department of Transportation and the department shall make the following information available for public inspection on the websites of the Department of Transportation or the department:(a)the terms of any vendor contract regarding the purchase, lease, rental, or use of a red light camera;(b)the amount paid to the vendor providing a red light camera unit; and(c)the number of violation warnings issued by the use of a red light camera.(13)On or before October 1, 2028, the Department of Transportation and the department shall provide a report to the Transportation Interim Committee that summarizes:(a)the effectiveness of red light camera enforcement at each high-risk intersection described in Subsection (2);(b)if available, the crash rates before and after implementation; and(c)other relevant data.(14)Nothing in this section prohibits the Department of Transportation or the department from using information for highway safety research that is gathered by a red light camera during the red light camera pilot program.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-1-241 is amended to read:63I-1-241. Repeal dates: Title 41.(1)Subsection 41-1a-1201(8), regarding the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Subsection 41-6a-102(34), regarding lane filtering, is repealed July 1, 2027.(3)Section 41-6a-312, Red light camera pilot program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)(4)Subsection 41-6a-704(6), regarding lane filtering, is repealed July 1, 2027.(4)(5)Subsection 41-6a-710(1)(c), regarding lane filtering, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)(6)Subsection 41-6a-1406(7)(b)(iii), regarding the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.(6)(7)Subsection 41-22-2(1), regarding an advisory council addressing off-highway vehicle issues, is repealed July 1, 2027.(7)(8)Subsection 41-22-10(1), regarding an advisory council addressing off-highway vehicle issues, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)(9)Subsection 41-22-8(3)(b), regarding the Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.